North Carolina, session 2025, HB282.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 136-189.10(2)g. reads as rewritten:
"g. Federally Federal and local government funded independent bicycle
and pedestrian improvements."
SECTION 2. G.S. 136-189.11(d)(3)c. reads as rewritten:
"c. Bicycle and pedestrian limitation. – The Department shall not may
provide financial support for federal and local government funded
independent bicycle and pedestrian improvement projects, except for
federal funds administered by the Department for that purpose. This
sub-subdivision shall not apply to funds allocated to a municipality
pursuant to G.S. 136-41.1 that are committed by the municipality as
matching funds for federal funds administered by the Department and
used for bicycle and pedestrian improvement projects. This limitation
shall not apply to funds authorized for projects in the State
Transportation Improvement Program that are scheduled for
construction as of October 1, 2013, in State fiscal year 2012-2013,
2013-2014, or 2014-2015.projects."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H282-v-1*